lingvodoc/static/parsers/hfst/anc_xal/rules.xfst
define Letters [ Vowels | Cons ];
define ConvXxXConvIpfviXxXR0 [ č i ] -> [ ǰ i ] || [ Vowels | LatCons ] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntCldXxXR1 a -> 0 || _ "+" ā d ;
define ConvXxXConvProgqsarXxXR2 [ q s ā r ] -> [ q s ē r ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvProgqsarXxXR3 [ q s ā r ] -> [ q s ē r ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvProgxaiXxXR4 [ x a i ] -> [ k e i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvProgxXxXR5 [ x ā ] -> [ k ē ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvPrelmaqcaXxXR6 [ m a q c a ] -> [ m e q c e ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvPrelmaqcaXxXR7 [ m a q c a ] -> [ m e q c e ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvConcbauXxXR8 [ b a č u ] -> [ b e č ü ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvConcbauXxXR9 [ b a č u ] -> [ b o č u ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvConcbauXxXR10 [ b a č u ] -> [ b ö č ü ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvConcbauXxXR11 [ b a č u ] -> [ b e č ü ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvConcbauXxXR12 [ b a č u ] -> [ b o č u ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvConcbauXxXR13 [ b a č u ] -> [ b ö č ü ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvTermtalaXxXR14 [ t a l a ] -> [ t e l e ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvTermtalaXxXR15 [ t a l a ] -> [ t o l o ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvTermtalaXxXR16 [ t a l a ] -> [ t ö l ö ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvTermtalaXxXR17 [ t a l a ] -> [ t e l e ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvTermtalaXxXR18 [ t a l a ] -> [ t o l o ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvTermtalaXxXR19 [ t a l a ] -> [ t ö l ö ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondxulXxXR20 [ x u l ā ] -> [ k ü l ē ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondxulXxXR21 [ x u l ā ] -> [ k ü l ē ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondbsuXxXR22 [ b ā s u ] -> [ b e s ü ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondbsuXxXR23 [ b ā s u ] -> [ b ō s u ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondbsuXxXR24 [ b ā s u ] -> [ b ȫ s ü ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondbsuXxXR25 [ b ā s u ] -> [ b e s ü ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondbsuXxXR26 [ b ā s u ] -> [ b ō s u ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondbsuXxXR27 [ b ā s u ] -> [ b ȫ s ü ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondxunXxXR28 [ x u n ā ] -> [ k ü n ē ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondxunXxXR29 [ x u n ā ] -> [ k ü n ē ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntOrphadXxXR30 [ ā d ] -> [ ē d ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntOrphadXxXR31 [ ā d ] -> [ ō d ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntOrphadXxXR32 [ ā d ] -> [ ȫ d ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntOrphadXxXR33 [ ā d ] -> [ ē d ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntOrphadXxXR34 [ ā d ] -> [ ō d ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntOrphadXxXR35 [ ā d ] -> [ ȫ d ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntCldXxXR36 ö -> 0 || _ "+" ȫ d ;
define ConvXxXConvAntCldXxXR37 u -> 0 || _ "+" ū d ;
define ConvXxXConvAntCldXxXR38 e -> 0 || _ "+" ē d ;
define ConvXxXConvCondIncorxulaXxXR39 [ x u l a ] -> [ k ü l e ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCondIncorxulaXxXR40 [ x u l a ] -> [ k ü l e ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAntCldXxXR41 o -> 0 || _ "+" ō d ;
define ConvXxXConvAntCldXxXR42 ü -> 0 || _ "+" ǖ d ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR0 [ t a ] -> [ d a ] || LatCons "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR1 [ d a ] -> [ d o ] || [ DiphthongO | o | ō ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR2 [ d a ] -> [ d ö ] || LabSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR3 [ d a ] -> [ d e ] || NarSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR4 [ t a ] -> [ q d a ] || [ HardVowels | LongHardVowels | DiphthongHard ] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR5 [ t a ] -> [ q d e ] || [ SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR6 [ t a ] -> [ t o ] || [ DiphthongO | o | ō ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR7 [ t a ] -> [ t ö ] || LabSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXPasstaXxXR8 [ t a ] -> [ t e ] || NarSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXSoclcaXxXR9 [ l c a ] -> [ l c e ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXRecpldaXxXR10 [ l d a ] -> [ l d o ] || [ DiphthongO | o | ō ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXRecpldaXxXR11 [ l d a ] -> [ l d ö ] || LabSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXRecpldaXxXR12 [ l d a ] -> [ l d e ] || NarSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR13 [ γ a ] -> [ g e ] || [ e | ü ] [?*] Cons "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR14 [ γ a ] -> [ γ o ] || [ o | u ] [?*] Cons "+" _  ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR15 [ γ a ] -> [ g ö ] || [ ö ] [?*] Cons "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR16 [ γ a ] -> [ x a ] || ConsSDB "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR17 [ x a ] -> x || _ "+" [ [ o | u ] u l ] ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR18 [ x a ] -> [ x o ] || LabHardVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR19 [ x a ] -> [ k ö ] || LabSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR20 [ x a ] -> [ k e ] || NarSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR21 [ γ a ] -> [ l γ a ] || [ LongVowels | Diphthong ] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR22 [ l γ a ] -> [ l g e ] || .#. NarSoftVowels Cons [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR23 [ l γ a ] -> [ l g e ] || .#. Cons NarSoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR24 [ l γ a ] -> [ l g e ] || [ DiphthongNarSoft | LongNarSoftVowels ]  "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR25 [ l γ a ] -> [ l γ o ] || [ DiphthongLabHard | LongLabHardVowels ] "+" _  ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR26 [ l γ a ] -> [ l g ö ] || [ DiphthongLabSoft | LongLabSoftVowels ]  "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR27 [ γ a ] -> [ [ o | u ] u l ] || HardVowels "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR28 [ γ a ] -> [ [ ö | ü ] ü l ] || SoftVowels "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR29 HardVowels -> 0 || _ "+" [ o u l ] ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR30 HardVowels -> 0 || _ "+" [ u u l ] ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR31 SoftVowels -> 0 || _ "+" [ ö ü l ] ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR32 SoftVowels -> 0 || _ "+" [ ü ü l ] ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR33 [ γ a ] -> [ i u l ] || i "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR34 [ i u l ] -> [ i ü l ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR35 i -> 0 || i "+" _ [ u | ü ] l ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR36 a -> ā || _ "@" "+" [ γ a ];
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR37 [ γ a ] -> 0 || ā "@" "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR38 e -> ē || _ "@" "+" ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR39 [ γ a ] -> 0 || ē "@" "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR40 o -> ō || _ "@" "+" ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR41 [ γ a ] -> 0 || ō "@" "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR42 ö -> ȫ || _ "@" "+" ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR43 [ γ a ] -> 0 || ȫ "@" "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR44 i -> ī || _ "@" "+" ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCausaXxXR45 [ γ a ] -> 0 || ī "@" "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplFutxuXxXR0 [ x u ] -> [ k ü ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplFutxuXxXR1 [ x u ] -> [ k ü ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplFutxuiXxXR2 [ x u i ] -> [ k u i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplFutxuiXxXR3 [ x u i ] -> [ k u i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplPresXxXR4 [ ā ] -> [ ē ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ .#.;
define PtcplXxXPtcplHabdaqXxXR5 [ d a q ] -> [ d e q ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplHabdaqXxXR6 [ d a q ] -> [ d o q ] || .#. [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplHabdaqXxXR7 [ d a q ] -> [ d ö q ] || .#. [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplHabdaqXxXR8 [ d a q ] -> [ d e q ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplHabdaqXxXR9 [ d a q ] -> [ d o q ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongO | o | ō | DiphthongU | u | ū ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplHabdaqXxXR10 [ d a q ] -> [ d ö q ] || .#. Cons [ DiphthongOSoft | ö | ȫ | DiphthongUSoft | ü | ǖ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define PtcplXxXPtcplPresXxXR11 [ ā ] -> [ ē ] || [ NarSoftVowels | SoftVowels | LongSoftVowels | DiphthongSoft ] [?*] "+" _ .#.;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR0 [ s ] -> [ d ] || n "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR1 n -> 0 || _ "+" d;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR2 [ s ] -> [ d ] || [ r | l | s ] "}" "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR3 [ r | l | s ] -> 0 || _ "}" "+" d;
define NumberXxXPlmuudXxXR4 [ m u u d ] -> [ m ü ü d ] || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPlmuudXxXR5 [ m u u d ] -> [ m ü ü d ] || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR6 [ s ] -> [ d ] || n "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR7 n -> 0 || _ "+" d;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR8 [ s ] -> [ d ] || [ r | l | s ] "}" "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPlsXxXR9 [ r | l | s ] -> 0 || _ "}" "+" d;
define NumberAnimXxXPlnarXxXR0 [ n a r ] -> [ n e r ] || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumberAnimXxXPluudXxXR1 [ č u u d ] -> [ č ü ü d ] || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumberAnimXxXPluudXxXR2 [ č u u d ] -> [ č ü ü d ] || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumberAnimXxXPlnarXxXR3 [ n a r ] -> [ n e r ] || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGeniyinXxXR0 [ i y i n ] -> [ y i n ] || [ SoftVowels | HardVowels | NarSoftVowels | DiphthongI ] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGeniyinXxXR1 [ i y i n ] -> [ i ] || n "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGeniyinXxXR2 [ i y i n ] -> [ g i y i n ] || NGCon "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAcc1iXxXR3 [ i ] -> [ y i ] || [ NarSoftVowels | ü ] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAcc1iXxXR4 [ i ] -> [ g i ] || [ q | NGCon ] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAcc1yigiXxXR5 [ y i g i ] -> [ g i ] || [ q | NGCon ] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR6 [ %- t u ] -> [ %- d u ] || [ Vowels | Diphthong | LatCons | NazCons ] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR7 [ %- t u ] -> [ %- d u ] || [ Vowels | Diphthong | LatCons | NazCons ] "$" "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR8 [ %- t u ] -> [ %- t ü ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR9 [ %- t u ] -> [ %- t ü ] || .#. Cons [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDattuXxXR10 [ %- d u ] -> [ %- d ü ] || .#. [ NarSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ] [?+] "+" _ ;
